Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-225
Police; regulation; penalties; power to prescribe.

A city of the first class may regulate its police force, establish and support a night watch, impose fines, forfeitures, confinement, and penalties for the breach of any ordinance, and for recovery and collection of such fines, forfeitures, and penalties. In default of payment, it may provide for confinement in the city or county jail or other place of confinement as may be provided by ordinance or as provided under section 16-252.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, XXXII, p. 254;

R.S.1913, § 4841;

C.S.1922, § 4009;

C.S.1929, § 16-226;

R.S.1943, § 16-225;

Laws 1965, c. 47, § 1, p. 247;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 29.